test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-alttar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - alttar: # 1A ei dift 1 tavussa?
    alttar+N+Sg+Nom: alttar
    alttar+N+Sg+Gen: alttar
    alttar+N+Sg+Acc: alttar
    alttar+N+Sg+Ill: alttarân
    alttar+N+Sg+Loc: alttarist
    alttar+N+Sg+Com: alttaráin
    alttar+N+Sg+Abe: alttarttáá
    alttar+N+Ess: alttarin
    alttar+N+Par: alttarid
    alttar+N+Pl+Nom: alttareh
    alttar+N+Pl+Gen: alttarij
    alttar+N+Pl+Acc: alttarijd
    alttar+N+Pl+Ill: alttaráid
    alttar+N+Pl+Loc: alttarijn
    alttar+N+Pl+Com: alttarijguin
    alttar+N+Pl+Abe: alttarijttáá
